Mississippi statutes. Title 39. Libraries, Arts, Archives and History
Chapter 11. Mississippi Arts Commission

§ 39-11-1.
Creation; composition; qualifications and appointment of members.

There is hereby created and established a state commission to be known as the Mississippi Arts Commission, to consist of fifteen members broadly representative of all fields of the performing, visual, literary arts, and the business community, and who are to be appointed by the governor from among citizens of the state who have demonstrated a vital interest in the performing, visual, or literary arts. These members shall also be representative of the different geographical areas of the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6199-21; Laws, 1968, ch. 498, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved June 24, 1968).

§ 39-11-3.
Terms of office and compensation of members; officers.

Of the members initially appointed to the Mississippi Arts Commission, three shall be appointed for terms of one year, three for terms of two years, three for terms of three years, three for terms of four years and three for terms of five years. Thereafter, terms shall be for five years. The members heretofore appointed to the commission under Executive Order No. 12 are to remain contingent members of the Mississippi Arts Commission until their successors are appointed under this chapter. No member of the commission who serves a full five-year term shall be eligible for reappointment during a one-year period following the expiration of his term. All vacancies shall be filled for the balance of the unexpired term in the same manner as original appointments. The members of the commission shall not receive any compensation for their services but shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as members of the commission. The commission will annually elect its chairman and other officers.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6199-22; Laws, 1968, ch. 498, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved June 24, 1968).

§ 39-11-5.
Executive director; staff; advisory panels.

The chairman shall employ, with the approval of the commission, an executive director as administrative officer. The executive director shall employ other officers, experts and employees as may be needed and shall fix their compensation within the amounts made available for such purposes. Employment of staff members is subject to the approval of the commission. The commission may also, at its discretion, form advisory panels from qualified persons within the state to obtain their advice and counsel on matters pertaining to the arts. Members of these panels shall serve at the will and pleasure of the commission and will receive no compensation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6199-23; Laws, 1968, ch. 498, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved June 24, 1968).

§ 39-11-7.
Duties and objectives of commission.

The duties and objectives of the commission shall be:

To stimulate and encourage throughout the state the study and presentation of the performing, visual, and literary arts and public interest and participation therein;

To encourage participation in, appreciation of, and education in the arts to meet the legitimate needs and aspirations of persons in all parts of the state;

To take such steps as may be necessary and appropriate, to encourage public interest in the cultural heritage of Mississippi, to expand the state’s cultural resources, and to promote the use of art in the state government’s activities and facilities; and

To encourage excellence and assist freedom of artistic expression essential for the well-being of the arts.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6199-24; Laws, 1968, ch. 498, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved June 24, 1968).

§ 39-11-9.
General powers of commission; Mississippi Fund for the Arts.

The Mississippi Arts Commission is authorized and empowered to hold public hearings, to enter into contracts within the limit of funds available therefor, with individuals, organizations and institutions for services furthering the objectives of the commission’s programs; to enter into contracts, within the limit of funds available therefor, with local and regional associations for cooperative endeavors furthering the objectives of the commission’s programs; to accept gifts, contributions and bequests of funds from individuals, foundations, corporations and other organizations or institutions for the purpose of furthering the objectives of the commission’s programs; to make and sign any agreements and to do and perform any acts that may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The commission may request and shall receive from any department, division, board, bureau, commission or agency of the state such assistance and data as will enable it properly to carry out its powers and duties hereunder.

A special fund to be designated as the Mississippi Fund for the Arts is hereby created in the State Treasury. All funds deposited in this fund shall be used exclusively for the objectives of the commission as herein provided. Donations, bequests and grants deposited into the Mississippi Fund for the Arts may be disbursed by the Mississippi Arts Commission in accordance with the terms of the bequest or grant and in compliance with the purposes and policies of the Mississippi Arts Commission. Any disbursements made from the fund shall be authorized by both the chairman and the executive director of the commission and shall be supported by official actions and votes spread upon the minutes of the commission at an open public meeting. Any unexpended balance in the fund at the end of the fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund and may be expended by the commissioner in subsequent fiscal years. Any interest earned on the fund may remain in the fund for disbursement by the commission in compliance with its purposes and policies. All transactions of the fund shall be reported annually to appropriate state agencies and subject to audit by the State Auditor and by auditors of donors. The Mississippi Fund for the Arts shall not be used for grants from federal agencies, including, but not limited to, the National Endowment for the Arts.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6199-25; Laws, 1968, ch. 498, § 5; Laws, 1994, ch. 383, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 410, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 17, 2000.).

§ 39-11-11.
Receipt and disbursement of federal funds.

The commission is the official agency of the state to receive and disburse appropriate funds made available by the federal government for programs related to the performing, visual, and literary arts.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6199-26; Laws, 1968, ch. 498, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved June 24, 1968).

§ 39-11-13.
Building Fund for the Arts.

A special fund, to be designated as the “Building Fund for the Arts,” is created within the State Treasury. The fund shall be maintained by the State Treasurer as a separate and special fund, separate and apart from the General Fund of the state. The fund shall consist of any money designated for deposit therein from any source, including, but not limited to, any state general obligation bonds issued for the purposes described in this section. Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and investment earnings on amounts in the fund shall be deposited into such fund.

[Repealed].

The entity to which such grants are made shall provide matching funds from local, federal or private sources equal to forty percent (40%) of the proposed project cost in order to be eligible for a grant under this section.

The maximum aggregate amount of monies in the special fund that may be used to provide grant funds to an entity or combination of entities under paragraph (b)(iii) of this subsection shall not exceed One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00), and no monies in the special fund may be used to provide grant funds under paragraph (b)(iii) of this subsection after July 1, 2003. The maximum aggregate amount of grant funds that may be provided to an entity or combination of entities under paragraph (b)(iii) of this subsection during a fiscal year shall not exceed Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00).

Amounts deposited into such special fund shall be disbursed to pay the costs of projects described in subsection (1) of this section. If any monies in the special fund are derived from proceeds of bonds issued under Sections 3 through 18 of Chapter 541, Laws of 2001, as amended by Chapter 540, Laws of 2002, as amended by Chapter 519, Laws of 2003, as amended by Chapter 1, Laws of 2004 Third Extraordinary Session, as amended by Chapter 538, Laws of 2006, as amended by Section 1 of Chapter 607, Laws of 2007, and are not used within four (4) years after the date such bond proceeds are deposited into the special fund, then the Mississippi Arts Commission shall provide an accounting of such unused monies to the State Bond Commission.

[Repealed]

The Mississippi Arts Commission is expressly authorized and empowered to receive and expend any local or other source funds in connection with the expenditure of funds provided for in this section. The expenditure of money deposited into the special fund shall be under the direction of the Mississippi Arts Commission, and such funds shall be paid by the State Treasurer upon warrants issued by the Department of Finance and Administration upon request of the Mississippi Arts Commission, which warrants shall be issued upon requisitions signed by the Executive Director of the Mississippi Arts Commission, or his or her designee.

The Mississippi Arts Commission shall adopt necessary rules and regulations to govern the administration of the program described in subsection (1) of this section, including, but not limited to, rules and regulations governing applications for grants and rules and regulations providing for the distribution of grant funds. The Mississippi Arts Commission shall comply with the provisions of the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 541, § 2; Laws, 2002, ch. 540, § 2; Laws, 2003, ch. 519, § 2; 2004, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 209; Laws, 2005, ch. 458, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 538, § 10; Laws, 2007, ch. 377, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 607, § 2; Laws, 2008, ch. 354, § 1; Laws, 2011, ch. 398, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 441, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.